California, session 20252026, AB860.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 52070 of the Education Code is amended to read:52070. (a) Not later than five days after adoption of a local control and accountability plan or annual update to a local control and accountability plan, the governing board of a school district shall file the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan with the county superintendent of schools.(b) On or before August 15 of each year, the county superintendent of schools may seek clarification, in writing, from the governing board of a school district about the contents of the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. Within 15 days days, the governing board of a school district shall respond, in writing, to requests for clarification.(c) (1) Within 15 days of receiving the response from the governing board of the school district, district pursuant to subdivision (b), the county superintendent of schools may submit recommendations, in writing, for amendments to the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. plan for school districts that have not been identified for technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071.(2) Within 15 days of receiving the response from the governing board of the school district pursuant to subdivision (b), the county superintendent of schools shall submit recommendations, in writing, for amendments to the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan for school districts that have been identified for technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071.(2)If a school district has not been identified for technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071, the(3) The governing board of the school district shall consider the recommendations submitted by the county superintendent of schools in a public meeting within 15 days of receiving the recommendations.(3)If a school district has been identified for technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071, the governing board of the school district shall include the recommended amendments submitted by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to paragraph (1) in its local control and accountability plan submitted to the county superintendent of schools.(d) The county superintendent of schools shall approve a local control and accountability plan or annual update to a local control and accountability plan on or before October 8, if the county superintendent of schools determines all of the following:(1) The local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan adheres to the template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064 and follows any instructions or directions for completing the template that are adopted by the state board, including, but not limited to, all of the following requirements:(A) If applicable to the school district, the local control and accountability plan includes one or more specific actions consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.(B) If applicable to the school district, the local control and accountability plan includes all required actions consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.(C) If applicable to the school district, the local control and accountability plan includes one or more focused goals consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.(D) Each specific action identified as contributing to the demonstration that the school district will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, consistent with regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07, subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 42238.07, and any applicable instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52064, provided on a schoolwide or districtwide basis is supported by the required description.(E) If applicable to the school district, the local control and accountability plan includes a description of the specific action or actions that improve services for unduplicated pupils, meets the requirements of subparagraph (D), and demonstrates how the degree of improvement in services is sufficient to increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064.(F) For school districts that meet the criteria of Section 52071 or 52072, or both, the local control and accountability plan includes both of the following: actions and services that implement the work related to technical assistance for improving the outcomes of the pupil group or groups that lead to identification.(i)Actions and services that implement the work related to technical assistance for improving the outcomes of the pupil group or groups that lead to identification.(ii)The recommended amendments submitted by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(2) The budget for the applicable fiscal year adopted by the governing board of the school district includes expenditures sufficient to implement the specific actions and strategies included in the local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of the school district, based on the projections of the costs included in the plan.(3) The local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan adheres to the expenditure requirements adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07 for funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03, and any applicable instructions for the local control and accountability plan developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52064, including, but not limited to, the requirement that any specific action provided on a schoolwide or districtwide basis is supported by the required description.(4) The local control and accountability plan includes the calculations required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 42238.07 and, if applicable to the school district pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.07, includes a description of the planned uses of the specified funds and a description of how the planned uses of those funds satisfy the requirements for specific actions to be considered as contributing toward meeting the increased or improved services requirement pursuant to regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07.(e) If a county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over a single school district, the Superintendent shall perform the duties specified in this section.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.